Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1811.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The goals of co-response are to de-escalate situations, divert people from criminal justice and emergency medical systems, and bring medical and behavioral health care into the field to serve vulnerable populations.Co-responders play a critical role in Washington's emergency response landscape, promoting a crisis care delivery system that appropriately responds to behavioral health emergencies and adapts to complex needs at the nexus of health and behavioral health. As Washington's crisis care delivery system continues to evolve, co-responders should be integrated into new and existing programs and legal frameworks in a way that consistently reflects their contributions to the health and well-being of the people of Washington and provides the necessary support for them to continue their critical work.Sec. 2. RCW 71.24.025 and 2024 c 368 s 2, 2024 c 367 s 1, and 2024 c 121 s 25 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.(1) "23-hour crisis relief center" means a community-based facility or portion of a facility which is licensed or certified by the department of health and open 24 hours a day, seven days a week, offering access to mental health and substance use care for no more than 23 hours and 59 minutes at a time per patient, and which accepts all behavioral health crisis walk-ins drop-offs from first responders, and individuals referred through the 988 system regardless of behavioral health acuity, and meets the requirements under RCW 71.24.916.(2) "988 crisis hotline" means the universal telephone number within the United States designated for the purpose of the national suicide prevention and mental health crisis hotline system operating through the national suicide prevention lifeline.(3) "Acutely mentally ill" means a condition which is limited to a short-term severe crisis episode of:(a) A mental disorder as defined in RCW 71.05.020 or, in the case of a child, as defined in RCW 71.34.020;(b) Being gravely disabled as defined in RCW 71.05.020 or, in the case of a child, a gravely disabled minor as defined in RCW 71.34.020; or(c) Presenting a likelihood of serious harm as defined in RCW 71.05.020 or, in the case of a child, as defined in RCW 71.34.020.(4) "Alcoholism" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on alcoholic beverages, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning.(5) "Approved substance use disorder treatment program" means a program for persons with a substance use disorder provided by a treatment program licensed or certified by the department as meeting standards adopted under this chapter.(6) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.(7) "Available resources" means funds appropriated for the purpose of providing community behavioral health programs, federal funds, except those provided according to Title XIX of the Social Security Act, and state funds appropriated under this chapter or chapter 71.05 RCW by the legislature during any biennium for the purpose of providing residential services, resource management services, community support services, and other behavioral health services. This does not include funds appropriated for the purpose of operating and administering the state psychiatric hospitals.(8) "Behavioral health administrative services organization" means an entity contracted with the authority to administer behavioral health services and programs under RCW 71.24.381, including crisis services and administration of chapter 71.05 RCW, the involuntary treatment act, for all individuals in a defined regional service area.(9) "Behavioral health aide" means a counselor, health educator, and advocate who helps address individual and community-based behavioral health needs, including those related to alcohol, drug, and tobacco abuse as well as mental health problems such as grief, depression, suicide, and related issues and is certified by a community health aide program of the Indian health service or one or more tribes or tribal organizations consistent with the provisions of 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1616l and RCW 43.71B.010 (7) and (8).(10) "Behavioral health provider" means a person licensed under chapter 18.57, 18.71, 18.71A, 18.83, 18.205, 18.225, or 18.79 RCW, as it applies to registered nurses and advanced practice registered ((nurse practitioners))nurses.(11) "Behavioral health services" means mental health services, substance use disorder treatment services, and co-occurring disorder treatment services as described in this chapter and chapter 71.36 RCW that, depending on the type of service, are provided by licensed or certified behavioral health agencies, behavioral health providers, or integrated into other health care providers.(12) "Child" means a person under the age of 18 years.(13) "Chronically mentally ill adult" or "adult who is chronically mentally ill" means an adult who has a mental disorder and meets at least one of the following criteria:(a) Has undergone two or more episodes of hospital care for a mental disorder within the preceding two years; or(b) Has experienced a continuous behavioral health hospitalization or residential treatment exceeding six months' duration within the preceding year; or(c) Has been unable to engage in any substantial gainful activity by reason of any mental disorder which has lasted for a continuous period of not less than 12 months. "Substantial gainful activity" shall be defined by the authority by rule consistent with Public Law 92-603, as amended.(14) "Clubhouse" means a community-based program that provides rehabilitation services and is licensed or certified by the department.(15) "Co-response" means a multidisciplinary partnership between first responders and human services professionals that responds to emergency situations involving behavioral health crises and people experiencing complex medical needs. Participants in co-response respond to in-progress 911 calls, 988 calls, and requests for service from dispatch and other first responders and include first responders such as public safety telecommunicators, law enforcement officers, firefighters, emergency medical technicians, and paramedics, and human services professionals such as social workers, behavioral health clinicians, advanced practice registered nurses, registered nurses, community health workers, and peer support specialists.(16) "Community behavioral health program" means all expenditures, services, activities, or programs, including reasonable administration and overhead, designed and conducted to prevent or treat substance use disorder, mental illness, or both in the community behavioral health system.(((16)))(17) "Community behavioral health service delivery system" means public, private, or tribal agencies that provide services specifically to persons with mental disorders, substance use disorders, or both, as defined under RCW 71.05.020 and receive funding from public sources.(((17)))(18) "Community support services" means services authorized, planned, and coordinated through resource management services including, at a minimum, assessment, diagnosis, emergency crisis intervention available 24 hours, seven days a week, prescreening determinations for persons who are mentally ill being considered for placement in nursing homes as required by federal law, screening for patients being considered for admission to residential services, diagnosis and treatment for children who are acutely mentally ill or severely emotionally or behaviorally disturbed discovered under screening through the federal Title XIX early and periodic screening, diagnosis, and treatment program, investigation, legal, and other nonresidential services under chapter 71.05 RCW, case management services, psychiatric treatment including medication supervision, counseling, psychotherapy, assuring transfer of relevant patient information between service providers, recovery services, and other services determined by behavioral health administrative services organizations.(((18)))(19) "Community-based crisis team" means a team that is part of an emergency medical services agency, a fire service agency, a public health agency, a medical facility, a nonprofit crisis response provider, or a city or county government entity, other than a law enforcement agency, that provides the on-site community-based interventions of a mobile rapid response crisis team for individuals who are experiencing a behavioral health crisis.(((19)))(20) "Consensus-based" means a program or practice that has general support among treatment providers and experts, based on experience or professional literature, and may have anecdotal or case study support, or that is agreed but not possible to perform studies with random assignment and controlled groups.(((20)))(21) "Coordinated regional behavioral health crisis response system" means the coordinated operation of 988 call centers, regional crisis lines, certified public safety telecommunicators, and other behavioral health crisis system partners within each regional service area.(((21)))(22) "County authority" means the board of county commissioners, county council, or county executive having authority to establish a behavioral health administrative services organization, or two or more of the county authorities specified in this subsection which have entered into an agreement to establish a behavioral health administrative services organization.(((22)))(23) "Crisis stabilization services" means services such as 23-hour crisis relief centers, crisis stabilization units, short-term respite facilities, peer-run respite services, and same-day walk-in behavioral health services, including within the overall crisis system components that operate like hospital emergency departments that accept all walk-ins, and ambulance, fire, and police drop-offs, or determine the need for involuntary hospitalization of an individual.(((23)))(24) "Crisis stabilization unit" has the same meaning as under RCW 71.05.020.(((24)))(25) "Department" means the department of health.(((25)))(26) "Designated 988 contact hub" or "988 contact hub" means a state-designated contact center that streamlines clinical interventions and access to resources for people experiencing a behavioral health crisis and participates in the national suicide prevention lifeline network to respond to statewide or regional 988 contacts that meets the requirements of RCW 71.24.890.(((26)))(27) "Designated crisis responder" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.05.020.(((27)))(28) "Director" means the director of the authority.(((28)))(29) "Drug addiction" means a disease characterized by a dependency on psychoactive chemicals, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning.(((29)))(30) "Early adopter" means a regional service area for which all of the county authorities have requested that the authority purchase medical and behavioral health services through a managed care health system as defined under RCW 71.24.380(7).(((30)))(31) "Emerging best practice" or "promising practice" means a program or practice that, based on statistical analyses or a well established theory of change, shows potential for meeting the evidence-based or research-based criteria, which may include the use of a program that is evidence-based for outcomes other than those listed in subsection (((31)))(32) of this section.(((31)))(32) "Evidence-based" means a program or practice that has been tested in heterogeneous or intended populations with multiple randomized, or statistically controlled evaluations, or both; or one large multiple site randomized, or statistically controlled evaluation, or both, where the weight of the evidence from a systemic review demonstrates sustained improvements in at least one outcome. "Evidence-based" also means a program or practice that can be implemented with a set of procedures to allow successful replication in Washington and, when possible, is determined to be cost-beneficial.(((32)))(33) "First responders" includes ambulance, fire, mobile rapid response crisis team, co-responder team, designated crisis responder, fire department mobile integrated health team, community assistance referral and education services program under RCW 35.21.930, and law enforcement personnel.(((33)))(34) "Immediate jeopardy" means a situation in which the licensed or certified behavioral health agency's noncompliance with one or more statutory or regulatory requirements has placed the health and safety of patients in its care at risk for serious injury, serious harm, serious impairment, or death.(((34)))(35) "Indian health care provider" means a health care program operated by the Indian health service or by a tribe, tribal organization, or urban Indian organization as those terms are defined in the Indian health care improvement act (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1603).(((35)))(36) "Intensive behavioral health treatment facility" means a community-based specialized residential treatment facility for individuals with behavioral health conditions, including individuals discharging from or being diverted from state and local hospitals, whose impairment or behaviors do not meet, or no longer meet, criteria for involuntary inpatient commitment under chapter 71.05 RCW, but whose care needs cannot be met in other community-based placement settings.(((36)))(37) "Licensed or certified behavioral health agency" means:(a) An entity licensed or certified according to this chapter or chapter 71.05 RCW;(b) An entity deemed to meet state minimum standards as a result of accreditation by a recognized behavioral health accrediting body recognized and having a current agreement with the department; or(c) An entity with a tribal attestation that it meets state minimum standards for a licensed or certified behavioral health agency.(((37)))(38) "Licensed physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine or osteopathic medicine and surgery in the state of Washington.(((38)))(39) "Long-term inpatient care" means inpatient services for persons committed for, or voluntarily receiving intensive treatment for, periods of 90 days or greater under chapter 71.05 RCW. "Long-term inpatient care" as used in this chapter does not include: (a) Services for individuals committed under chapter 71.05 RCW who are receiving services pursuant to a conditional release or a court-ordered less restrictive alternative to detention; or (b) services for individuals voluntarily receiving less restrictive alternative treatment on the grounds of the state hospital.(((39)))(40) "Managed care organization" means an organization, having a certificate of authority or certificate of registration from the office of the insurance commissioner, that contracts with the authority under a comprehensive risk contract to provide prepaid health care services to enrollees under the authority's managed care programs under chapter 74.09 RCW.(((40)))(41) "Mental health peer-run respite center" means a peer-run program to serve individuals in need of voluntary, short-term, noncrisis services that focus on recovery and wellness.(((41)))(42) Mental health "treatment records" include registration and all other records concerning persons who are receiving or who at any time have received services for mental illness, which are maintained by the department of social and health services or the authority, by behavioral health administrative services organizations and their staffs, by managed care organizations and their staffs, or by treatment facilities. "Treatment records" do not include notes or records maintained for personal use by a person providing treatment services for the entities listed in this subsection, or a treatment facility if the notes or records are not available to others.(((42)))(43) "Mentally ill persons," "persons who are mentally ill," and "the mentally ill" mean persons and conditions defined in subsections (3), (13), (((51)))(52), and (((52)))(53) of this section.(((43)))(44) "Mobile rapid response crisis team" means a team that provides professional on-site community-based intervention such as outreach, de-escalation, stabilization, resource connection, and follow-up support for individuals who are experiencing a behavioral health crisis, that shall include certified peer counselors as a best practice to the extent practicable based on workforce availability, and that meets standards for response times established by the authority.(((44)))(45) "Recovery" means a process of change through which individuals improve their health and wellness, live a self-directed life, and strive to reach their full potential.(((45)))(46) "Regional crisis line" means the behavioral health crisis hotline in each regional service area which provides crisis response services 24 hours a day, seven days a week, 365 days a year including but not limited to dispatch of mobile rapid response crisis teams, community-based crisis teams, and designated crisis responders. A regional crisis line may not dispatch law enforcement.(((46)))(47) "Research-based" means a program or practice that has been tested with a single randomized, or statistically controlled evaluation, or both, demonstrating sustained desirable outcomes; or where the weight of the evidence from a systemic review supports sustained outcomes as described in subsection (((31)))(32) of this section but does not meet the full criteria for evidence-based.(((47)))(48) "Residential services" means a complete range of residences and supports authorized by resource management services and which may involve a facility, a distinct part thereof, or services which support community living, for persons who are acutely mentally ill, adults who are chronically mentally ill, children who are severely emotionally disturbed, or adults who are seriously disturbed and determined by the behavioral health administrative services organization or managed care organization to be at risk of becoming acutely or chronically mentally ill. The services shall include at least evaluation and treatment services as defined in chapter 71.05 RCW, acute crisis respite care, long-term adaptive and rehabilitative care, and supervised and supported living services, and shall also include any residential services developed to service persons who are mentally ill in nursing homes, residential treatment facilities, assisted living facilities, and adult family homes, and may include outpatient services provided as an element in a package of services in a supported housing model. Residential services for children in out-of-home placements related to their mental disorder shall not include the costs of food and shelter, except for children's long-term residential facilities existing prior to January 1, 1991.(((48)))(49) "Resilience" means the personal and community qualities that enable individuals to rebound from adversity, trauma, tragedy, threats, or other stresses, and to live productive lives.(((49)))(50) "Resource management services" mean the planning, coordination, and authorization of residential services and community support services administered pursuant to an individual service plan for: (a) Adults and children who are acutely mentally ill; (b) adults who are chronically mentally ill; (c) children who are severely emotionally disturbed; or (d) adults who are seriously disturbed and determined by a behavioral health administrative services organization or managed care organization to be at risk of becoming acutely or chronically mentally ill. Such planning, coordination, and authorization shall include mental health screening for children eligible under the federal Title XIX early and periodic screening, diagnosis, and treatment program. Resource management services include seven day a week, 24 hour a day availability of information regarding enrollment of adults and children who are mentally ill in services and their individual service plan to designated crisis responders, evaluation and treatment facilities, and others as determined by the behavioral health administrative services organization or managed care organization, as applicable.(((50)))(51) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of health.(((51)))(52) "Seriously disturbed person" means a person who:(a) Is gravely disabled or presents a likelihood of serious harm to himself or herself or others, or to the property of others, as a result of a mental disorder as defined in chapter 71.05 RCW;(b) Has been on conditional release status, or under a less restrictive alternative order, at some time during the preceding two years from an evaluation and treatment facility or a state mental health hospital;(c) Has a mental disorder which causes major impairment in several areas of daily living;(d) Exhibits suicidal preoccupation or attempts; or(e) Is a child diagnosed by a mental health professional, as defined in chapter 71.34 RCW, as experiencing a mental disorder which is clearly interfering with the child's functioning in family or school or with peers or is clearly interfering with the child's personality development and learning.(((52)))(53) "Severely emotionally disturbed child" or "child who is severely emotionally disturbed" means a child who has been determined by the behavioral health administrative services organization or managed care organization, if applicable, to be experiencing a mental disorder as defined in chapter 71.34 RCW, including those mental disorders that result in a behavioral or conduct disorder, that is clearly interfering with the child's functioning in family or school or with peers and who meets at least one of the following criteria:(a) Has undergone inpatient treatment or placement outside of the home related to a mental disorder within the last two years;(b) Has undergone involuntary treatment under chapter 71.34 RCW within the last two years;(c) Is currently served by at least one of the following child-serving systems: Juvenile justice, child-protection/welfare, special education, or developmental disabilities;(d) Is at risk of escalating maladjustment due to:(i) Chronic family dysfunction involving a caretaker who is mentally ill or inadequate;(ii) Changes in custodial adult;(iii) Going to, residing in, or returning from any placement outside of the home, for example, behavioral health hospital, short-term inpatient, residential treatment, group or foster home, or a correctional facility;(iv) Subject to repeated physical abuse or neglect;(v) Drug or alcohol abuse; or(vi) Homelessness.(((53)))(54) "State minimum standards" means minimum requirements established by rules adopted and necessary to implement this chapter by:(a) The authority for:(i) Delivery of mental health and substance use disorder services; and(ii) Community support services and resource management services;(b) The department of health for:(i) Licensed or certified behavioral health agencies for the purpose of providing mental health or substance use disorder programs and services, or both;(ii) Licensed behavioral health providers for the provision of mental health or substance use disorder services, or both; and(iii) Residential services.(((54)))(55) "Substance use disorder" means a cluster of cognitive, behavioral, and physiological symptoms indicating that an individual continues using the substance despite significant substance-related problems. The diagnosis of a substance use disorder is based on a pathological pattern of behaviors related to the use of the substances.(((55)))(56) "Tribe," for the purposes of this section, means a federally recognized Indian tribe.Sec. 3. RCW 5.60.060 and 2024 c 295 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A spouse or domestic partner shall not be examined for or against his or her spouse or domestic partner, without the consent of the spouse or domestic partner; nor can either during marriage or during the domestic partnership or afterward, be without the consent of the other, examined as to any communication made by one to the other during the marriage or the domestic partnership. But this exception shall not apply to a civil action or proceeding by one against the other, nor to a criminal action or proceeding for a crime committed by one against the other, nor to a criminal action or proceeding against a spouse or domestic partner if the marriage or the domestic partnership occurred subsequent to the filing of formal charges against the defendant, nor to a criminal action or proceeding for a crime committed by said spouse or domestic partner against any child of whom said spouse or domestic partner is the parent or guardian, nor to a proceeding under chapter 71.05 or 71.09 RCW: PROVIDED, That the spouse or the domestic partner of a person sought to be detained under chapter 71.05 or 71.09 RCW may not be compelled to testify and shall be so informed by the court prior to being called as a witness.(2)(a) An attorney or counselor shall not, without the consent of his or her client, be examined as to any communication made by the client to him or her, or his or her advice given thereon in the course of professional employment.(b) A parent or guardian of a minor child arrested on a criminal charge may not be examined as to a communication between the child and his or her attorney if the communication was made in the presence of the parent or guardian. This privilege does not extend to communications made prior to the arrest.(3) A member of the clergy, a Christian Science practitioner listed in the Christian Science Journal, or a priest shall not, without the consent of a person making the confession or sacred confidence, be examined as to any confession or sacred confidence made to him or her in his or her professional character, in the course of discipline enjoined by the church to which he or she belongs.(4) Subject to the limitations under RCW 71.05.217 (6) and (7), a physician or surgeon or osteopathic physician or surgeon or podiatric physician or surgeon shall not, without the consent of his or her patient, be examined in a civil action as to any information acquired in attending such patient, which was necessary to enable him or her to prescribe or act for the patient, except as follows:(a) In any judicial proceedings regarding a child's injury, neglect, or sexual abuse or the cause thereof; and(b) Ninety days after filing an action for personal injuries or wrongful death, the claimant shall be deemed to waive the physician-patient privilege. Waiver of the physician-patient privilege for any one physician or condition constitutes a waiver of the privilege as to all physicians or conditions, subject to such limitations as a court may impose pursuant to court rules.(5) A public officer shall not be examined as a witness as to communications made to him or her in official confidence, when the public interest would suffer by the disclosure.(6)(a) A peer supporter shall not, without consent of the peer support services recipient making the communication, be compelled to testify about any communication made to the peer supporter by the peer support services recipient while receiving individual or group services. The peer supporter must be designated as such by their employing agency prior to providing peer support services. The privilege only applies when the communication was made to the peer supporter while acting in his or her capacity as a peer supporter. The privilege applies regardless of whether the peer support services recipient is an employee of the same agency as the peer supporter. Peer support services may be coordinated or designated among first responder agencies pursuant to chapter 10.93 RCW, interlocal agreement, or other similar provision, provided however that a written agreement is not required for the privilege to apply. The privilege does not apply if the peer supporter was an initial responding first responder, department of corrections staff person, or jail staff person; a witness; or a party to the incident which prompted the delivery of peer support services to the peer support services recipient.(b) For purposes of this section:(i) "First responder" means:(A) A law enforcement officer;(B) A limited authority law enforcement officer;(C) A firefighter;(D) An emergency services dispatcher or recordkeeper;(E) Emergency medical personnel, as licensed or certified by this state;(F) A member or former member of the Washington national guard acting in an emergency response capacity pursuant to chapter 38.52 RCW; ((or))(G) A coroner or medical examiner, or a coroner's or medical examiner's agent or employee; or(H) An individual engaged in co-response services, as defined in RCW 71.24.025.(ii) "Law enforcement officer" means a general authority Washington peace officer as defined in RCW 10.93.020.(iii) "Limited authority law enforcement officer" means a limited authority Washington peace officer as defined in RCW 10.93.020 who is employed by the department of corrections, state parks and recreation commission, department of natural resources, liquor and cannabis board, or Washington state gambling commission.(iv) "Peer support services recipient" means:(A) A first responder;(B) A department of corrections staff person; or(C) A jail staff person.(v) "Peer supporter" means:(A) A first responder, retired first responder, department of corrections staff person, or jail staff person or a civilian employee of a first responder entity or agency, local jail, or state agency who has received training to provide emotional and moral support and services to a peer support services recipient who needs those services as a result of an incident or incidents in which the peer support services recipient was involved while acting in his or her official capacity or to deal with other stress that is impacting the peer support services recipient's performance of official duties; or(B) A nonemployee who has been designated by the first responder entity or agency, local jail, statewide organization focused on co-response outreach, or state agency to provide emotional and moral support and counseling to a peer support services recipient who needs those services as a result of an incident or incidents in which the peer support services recipient was involved while acting in his or her official capacity.(7) A sexual assault advocate may not, without the consent of the victim, be examined as to any communication made between the victim and the sexual assault advocate.(a) For purposes of this section, "sexual assault advocate" means the employee or volunteer from a community sexual assault program or underserved populations provider, victim assistance unit, program, or association, that provides information, medical or legal advocacy, counseling, or support to victims of sexual assault, who is designated by the victim to accompany the victim to the hospital or other health care facility and to proceedings concerning the alleged assault, including police and prosecution interviews and court proceedings.(b) A sexual assault advocate may disclose a confidential communication without the consent of the victim if failure to disclose is likely to result in a clear, imminent risk of serious physical injury or death of the victim or another person. Any sexual assault advocate participating in good faith in the disclosing of records and communications under this section shall have immunity from any liability, civil, criminal, or otherwise, that might result from the action. In any proceeding, civil or criminal, arising out of a disclosure under this section, the good faith of the sexual assault advocate who disclosed the confidential communication shall be presumed.(8) A domestic violence advocate may not, without the consent of the victim, be examined as to any communication between the victim and the domestic violence advocate.(a) For purposes of this section, "domestic violence advocate" means an employee or supervised volunteer from a community-based domestic violence program or human services program that provides information, advocacy, counseling, crisis intervention, emergency shelter, or support to victims of domestic violence and who is not employed by, or under the direct supervision of, a law enforcement agency, a prosecutor's office, or the child protective services section of the department of children, youth, and families as defined in RCW 26.44.020.(b) A domestic violence advocate may disclose a confidential communication without the consent of the victim if failure to disclose is likely to result in a clear, imminent risk of serious physical injury or death of the victim or another person. This section does not relieve a domestic violence advocate from the requirement to report or cause to be reported an incident under RCW 26.44.030(1) or to disclose relevant records relating to a child as required by RCW 26.44.030(15). Any domestic violence advocate participating in good faith in the disclosing of communications under this subsection is immune from liability, civil, criminal, or otherwise, that might result from the action. In any proceeding, civil or criminal, arising out of a disclosure under this subsection, the good faith of the domestic violence advocate who disclosed the confidential communication shall be presumed.(9) A mental health counselor, independent clinical social worker, or marriage and family therapist licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW may not disclose, or be compelled to testify about, any information acquired from persons consulting the individual in a professional capacity when the information was necessary to enable the individual to render professional services to those persons except:(a) With the written authorization of that person or, in the case of death or disability, the person's personal representative;(b) If the person waives the privilege by bringing charges against the mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW;(c) In response to a subpoena from the secretary of health. The secretary may subpoena only records related to a complaint or report under RCW 18.130.050;(d) As required under chapter 26.44 or 74.34 RCW or RCW 71.05.217 (6) or (7); or(e) To any individual if the mental health counselor, independent clinical social worker, or marriage and family therapist licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW reasonably believes that disclosure will avoid or minimize an imminent danger to the health or safety of the individual or any other individual; however, there is no obligation on the part of the provider to so disclose.(10) An individual who acts as a sponsor providing guidance, emotional support, and counseling in an individualized manner to a person participating in an alcohol or drug addiction recovery fellowship may not testify in any civil action or proceeding about any communication made by the person participating in the addiction recovery fellowship to the individual who acts as a sponsor except with the written authorization of that person or, in the case of death or disability, the person's personal representative.(11)(a) Neither a union representative nor an employee the union represents or has represented shall be examined as to, or be required to disclose, any communication between an employee and union representative or between union representatives made in the course of union representation except:(i) To the extent such examination or disclosure appears necessary to prevent the commission of a crime that is likely to result in a clear, imminent risk of serious physical injury or death of a person;(ii) In actions, civil or criminal, in which the represented employee is accused of a crime or assault or battery;(iii) In actions, civil or criminal, where a union member is a party to the action, the union member may obtain a copy of any statement previously given by that union member concerning the subject matter of the action and may elicit testimony concerning such statements. The right of the union member to obtain such statements, or the union member's possession of such statements, does not render them discoverable over the objection of the union member;(iv) In actions, regulatory, civil, or criminal, against the union or its affiliated, subordinate, or parent bodies or their agents; or(v) When an admission of, or intent to engage in, criminal conduct is revealed by the represented union member to the union representative.(b) The privilege created in this subsection (11) does not apply to any record of communications that would otherwise be subject to disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW.(c) The privilege created in this subsection (11) may not interfere with an employee's or union representative's applicable statutory mandatory reporting requirements, including but not limited to duties to report in chapters 26.44, 43.101, and 74.34 RCW.(d) For purposes of this subsection:(i) "Employee" means a person represented by a certified or recognized union regardless of whether the employee is a member of the union.(ii) "Union" means any lawful organization that has as one of its primary purposes the representation of employees in their employment relations with employers, including without limitation labor organizations defined by 29 U.S.C. Sec. 152(5) and 5 U.S.C. Sec. 7103(a)(4), representatives defined by 45 U.S.C. Sec. 151, and bargaining representatives defined in RCW 41.56.030, and employee organizations as defined in RCW 28B.52.020, 41.59.020, 41.80.005, 41.76.005, 47.64.011, and 53.18.010.(iii) "Union representation" means action by a union on behalf of one or more employees it represents in regard to their employment relations with employers, including personnel matters, grievances, labor disputes, wages, rates of pay, hours of employment, conditions of work, or collective bargaining.(iv) "Union representative" means a person authorized by a union to act for the union in regard to union representation.(v) "Communication" includes any oral, written, or electronic communication or document containing such communication.Sec. 4. RCW 51.32.181 and 2022 c 290 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) For frontline employees who are covered under this title, there exists a prima facie presumption that any infectious or contagious diseases that are transmitted through respiratory droplets or aerosols, or through contact with contaminated surfaces and are the subject of a public health emergency are occupational diseases under RCW 51.08.140 during a public health emergency.(2) The frontline employee must provide verification, as required by the department by rule, to the department and the self-insured employer that the employee has contracted the infectious or contagious disease that is the subject of the public health emergency.(3) This presumption of occupational disease may be rebutted by a preponderance of the evidence that:(a) The exposure to the infectious or contagious disease which is the subject of the public health emergency occurred from other employment or nonemployment activities; or(b) The employee was working from the employee's home, on leave from the employee's employment, or some combination thereof, for the period of quarantine consistent with recommended guidance from state and federal health officials for the disease immediately prior to the employee's injury, occupational disease, or period of incapacity that resulted from exposure to the disease which is the subject of the public health emergency.(4)(a) RCW 51.32.090(7) does not apply to an occupational disease under this section except that no worker shall receive compensation for or during the day on which the occupational disease was contracted. For the purposes of this subsection (4), the day on which the occupational disease was contracted is whichever date occurs first of the following:(i) The date that the worker first missed work due to symptoms of the infectious or contagious disease;(ii) The date the worker was quarantined by a medical provider or public health official; or(iii) The date the worker received a positive test result confirming contraction of the infectious or contagious disease.(b) If leave or similar benefits are paid to the frontline employee as part of a federal or state program for these employees during the public health emergency, temporary total disability benefits are not payable for the same period of time covered by the federal or state program.(5) When calculating assessments due to the department for which total claim costs are the basis, self-insured employers and self-insurance hospital groups formed under RCW 51.14.150 and 51.14.160 may deduct the cost of payments made under this section from the total of all claim costs reported.(6) Costs of the payments under this section shall not affect the experience rating of employers insured by the state fund.(7) As used in this section:(a) "Assisted living facility" has the same meaning as in RCW 18.20.020.(b) "Farm work" means work performed on a farm, in the employ of any person, in connection with the cultivation of the soil, or in connection with raising or harvesting any agricultural or horticultural commodity, including raising, shearing, feeding, caring for, training, and management of livestock, bees, poultry, and furbearing animals and wildlife, or in the employ of the owner or tenant or other operator of a farm in connection with the operation, management, conservation, improvement, or maintenance of such farm and its tools and equipment. For the purposes of this subsection, "farm work" includes floriculture.(c) "Food distribution work" means work where the primary duties include transporting food from food producers or manufacturers to food warehouses or food service operators and retailers.(d) "Food manufacturing work" means work performed for an employer whose North American industry classification code is within "311."(e) "Food processing work" means work handling or processing of any food in any manner of preparation for sale for an employer required to be licensed by the department of agriculture under chapter 69.07 RCW.(f) "Frontline employee" includes the following employees:(i) First responders, including law enforcement officers, firefighters, emergency medical service providers, paramedics, ((and)) ambulance drivers, and other members of first response teams engaged in co-response, as defined in RCW 71.24.025. "Firefighters" includes wildland firefighters when performing wildfire suppression or other emergency duties under the incident command system if the firefighter has in-person interaction with the general public or other firefighters as part of their job duties;(ii) Employees performing food processing, food manufacturing, food distribution, farm, and meat packing work;(iii) Maintenance, janitorial, and food service workers at any facility treating patients diagnosed with the infectious or contagious disease that is the subject of the public health emergency;(iv) Drivers and operators employed by a transit agency or any other public entity authorized under state law to provide mass transportation services to the general public;(v) Employees working at a child care facility licensed by the department of children, youth, and families under chapter 43.216 RCW, if the employee has in-person interaction with children or other members of the general public as part of their job duties;(vi) Employees employed by a retail store that remains open to the general public during the public health emergency, if the employee has in-person interaction with the general public as part of their job duties or has in-person interaction with other employees. For the purposes of this subsection, "retail store" means a business whose North American industry classification code is within "44-45";(vii) Employees employed by a hotel, motel, or other transient accommodation licensed under chapter 70.62 RCW that remains open to the general public during the public health emergency, if the employee has in-person interaction with the general public as part of their job duties or has in-person interaction with other employees;(viii) Employees employed by a restaurant, if the employee has in-person interaction with the general public as part of their job duties or works in the kitchen of the restaurant and has in-person interaction with other employees. For the purposes of this subsection, "restaurant" has the same meaning as in RCW 66.04.010;(ix) Home care aides certified under chapter 18.88B RCW and home health aides that provide services under chapter 70.126 RCW that primarily work in the home of the individual receiving care;(x)(A) Corrections officers and correctional support employees working at a correctional institution.(B) For the purposes of this subsection (7)(f)(x):(I) "Correctional institution" has the same meaning as in RCW 9.94.049.(II) "Corrections officer" means any corrections agency employee whose primary job function is to provide custody, safety, and security of prisoners in jails and detention facilities.(III) "Correctional support employee" means any employee who provides food services or janitorial services in a correctional institution;(xi) Educational employees, including classroom teachers, paraeducators, principals, librarians, school bus drivers, and other educational support staff, of any school district, or a contractor of a school district, that are required to be physically present at a school or on the grounds of a school where classes are being taught in person, in a transportation vehicle necessary for school operations, or in the home of a student as part of their job duties, if the employee has in-person interaction with students, a student's family members, or other employees as part of their job duties;(xii) Employees of institutions of higher education that are required to be physically present on campus when classes are being taught in person, if the employee has in-person interaction with students or the general public as part of their job duties. For the purposes of this subsection, "institution of higher education" has the same meaning as in RCW 28B.10.016;(xiii) Employees employed by a public library that remains open to the general public during the public health emergency, if the employee has in-person interaction with the general public as part of their job duties or has in-person interaction with other employees. For the purposes of this subsection, "public library" means a library covered by chapter 27.12 RCW;(xiv) Employees employed by the department of licensing who are assigned to review, process, approve, and issue driver licenses to the general public, if the employee has in-person interaction with the general public as part of their job duties or has in-person interaction with other employees.(g) "Meat packing work" means work slaughtering animals and processing and packaging meat products for sale and the rendering of animal by-products.(h) "Nursing home" means a nursing home licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW.(i) "Public health emergency" means a declaration or order concerning any infectious or contagious diseases, including a pandemic and is issued as follows:(i) The president of the United States has declared a national or regional emergency that covers every county in the state of Washington; or(ii) The governor of Washington has declared a state of emergency under RCW 43.06.010(12) in every county in the state.(j) "School" has the same meaning as in RCW 28A.210.070.Sec. 5. RCW 71.24.905 and 2022 c 232 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the University of Washington shall, in consultation and collaboration with the co-responder outreach alliance and other stakeholders as appropriate in the field of co-response:(a) Establish regular opportunities for police, fire, emergency medical services, peer counselors, and behavioral health personnel working in co-response to convene for activities such as training, exchanging information and best practices around the state and nationally, and providing the University of Washington with assistance with activities described in this section;(b) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, administer a small budget to help defray costs for training and professional development, which may include expenses related to attending or hosting site visits with experienced co-response teams;(c) Develop an assessment to be provided to the governor and legislature by June 30, 2023, describing and analyzing the following:(i) Existing capacity and shortfalls across the state in co-response teams and the co-response workforce;(ii) Current alignment of co-response teams with cities, counties, behavioral health administrative services organizations, and call centers; distribution among police, fire, and EMS-based co-response models; and desired alignment;(iii) Current funding strategies for co-response teams and identification of federal funding opportunities;(iv) Current data systems utilized and an assessment of their effectiveness for use by co-responders, program planners, and policymakers;(v) Current training practices and identification of future state training practices;(vi) Alignment with designated crisis responder activities;(vii) Recommendations concerning best practices to prepare co-responders to achieve objectives and meet future state crisis system needs, including those of the 988 system;(viii) Recommendations to align co-responder activities with efforts to reform ways in which persons experiencing a behavioral health crisis interact with the criminal justice system; and(ix) Assessment of training and educational needs for current and future co-responder workforce;(d) Beginning in calendar year 2023, begin development of model training curricula for individuals participating in co-response teams; and(e) Beginning in calendar year 2023, host an annual statewide conference that draws state and national co-responders.(2) Stakeholders in the field of co-response may include, but are not limited to, the Washington association of designated crisis responders; state associations representing police, fire, and emergency medical services personnel; the Washington council on behavioral health; the state ((enhanced)) 911 system; 988 crisis call centers; and the peer workforce alliance.(3)(a) By January 1, 2026,Â the University of Washington school of social work, in consultation with the authority and the behavioral health administrative services organizations, shall establish a program to administer a crisis responder training academy resulting in a certification in best practices in crisis responseÂ in three behavioral health administrative services organizations with a significant co-response footprint. The curriculum must include: Safety and crisis de-escalation tactics, teamwork across the disciplines including peer support workers, culturally responsive crisis care, suicide intervention, substance use disorder engagement, overdose response, and an eight-hour session with clinical staff of designated 988 contact hubs, crisis relief centers, crisis call centers, and employees of 911 public safety answering points, explaining best coordination strategies. Best practices for regional protocol development must be included.(b) By January 1, 2027, the crisis responder training academy shall be expanded to all behavioral health administrative services organizations and provide openings for 988 rapid response teams, co-response teams, mobile community response teams, and alternative response teams. The behavioral health administrative services organizations shall promote the training academy available to local crisis responder and co-response teams in their regions. The certification shall be optional and may not serve as an additional requirement for licensure for crisis responders or licensed human services professionals.--- END ---